tests/morphophonology/w-phon.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] some у verb forms": 
    ту<v><iv><prc_impf> : туа
    ту<v><iv><pres><p3><sg> : туа
    ту<v><iv><pres><p2><pl> : туасыз

  "[twol] some у noun forms": 
    су<n><px1sg><nom> : суым
    ту<n><px1sg><nom> : тууым

  "[twol] gerunds of verbs ending in consonants":
    кайт<v><iv><ger><nom> : кайту
    бел<v><tv><ger><nom> : белү
    җыел<v><iv><ger><nom> : җыелу
    кайт<v><iv><ger><px3sp><nom> : кайтуы
    бел<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : белүе
    җыел<v><iv><ger><px3sp><nom> : җыелуы

  "[twol] gerunds of verbs ending in low vowels":
    сөйлә<v><tv><ger><nom> : сөйләү
    уйна<v><tv><ger><nom> : уйнау
    сөйлә<v><tv><ger><px3sp><acc> : сөйләвен
    уйна<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : уйнавы

  "[twol] gerunds of verbs ending in high vowels":
    укы<v><tv><ger><nom> : уку
    төзе<v><tv><ger><nom> : төзү
    укы<v><tv><ger><dat> : укуга
    төзе<v><tv><ger><dat> : төзүгә
    укы<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : укуы
    төзе<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : төзүе

  "[twol] gerunds of verbs ending in й":
    сөй<v><tv><ger><nom> : сөю
    куй<v><tv><ger><nom> : кую
    сөй<v><tv><ger><dat> : сөюгә
    куй<v><tv><ger><dat> : куюга
    сөй<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : сөюе
    куй<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : куюы
